California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The legislative body of the city proposed to be annexed shall agree in writing with the board upon the terms and conditions of annexation, which agreement, among other things, may provide for the levy and collection of special taxes within the city in addition to the taxes elsewhere in this act provided for, the fixing of rates, rentals, and charges differing from those fixed or existing elsewhere within the district, the incurring or assumption of indebtedness, or the making of a payment or payments, or the transfer of property, real and personal, and other assets to the district by the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90772.

As an alternative to commencement of annexation proceedings by action of the legislative body of a city, a petition signed by voters within the city proposed to be annexed, equal in number to at least 10 percent of the total vote cast at the last general election, and asking that proceedings be taken for its annexation, may be addressed to the board and filed with the secretary of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90773.

The petition may include one or more separate documents, but each document shall contain the affidavit of the party who circulated it, certifying that each name signed thereto is the true signature of the person whose name it purports to be. The secretary of the district shall compare the signatures on the petition with the affidavits of registration on file with the county elections official and if he or she finds that the petition has been signed by the required number of voters he or she shall attach his or her signature thereto and present the petition
 to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 110.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

90774.

If the board determines that the annexation of the city, whose voters have petitioned pursuant to Section 90773, would facilitate the acquisition or operation of any transit facilities for the district or be of advantage to the district, then the board shall also determine the terms and conditions upon which the annexation should be made. The terms and conditions of annexation shall be embodied in an annexation agreement. The annexation agreement may provide, among other things, for any or all of the items set forth in Section 90771.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Approval by District [90790. - 90796.]

90790.

The agreement shall become effective and be binding upon the district and the city when approved in the manner set forth in this chapter.

The board shall by ordinance setting forth the agreement at length declare its intention of causing it to be executed by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90791.

The ordinance, together with a notice fixing the time and place for hearing thereon, shall be published in the district pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code. The time fixed for the hearing shall be not less than 30 nor more than 60 days from the date of the publication of the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90792.

At the hearing any person interested may file with the board written objections to the execution of the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90793.

Upon the hearing the board shall determine whether or not the agreement will be carried into execution and shall hear and determine all objections thereto. Failure of any person interested in the district or in the matter of the proposed execution of the agreement to show cause in writing pursuant to Section 90792 constitutes an assent on his part to a change in the boundaries of the district and to the execution of the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90794.

Any hearing on the agreement may be adjourned from time to time by the board without further notice other than an order to be entered upon the minutes of the meeting fixing the time and place of adjournment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90795.

If no protests are filed or if the protests filed are overruled and denied, the board shall by resolution finally approve the agreement and authorize its execution, which shall become effective when executed by the city, duly authorized in the manner provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90796.

When executed by the district the agreement shall be dated and an executed copy filed with the secretary of the district. An executed copy shall also be filed with the clerk of the city to be annexed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Approval by City [90810. - 90815.]

90810.

At any time after the board has finally approved the agreement of annexation the legislative body of the city to be annexed shall cause an election to be held in the city to determine whether the city will be annexed to the district upon the terms and conditions stated in the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90810.5.

The city shall cause to be held, concurrent with the annexation election, an election for the purpose of selecting one board member for the district in the event the annexation is successful. The initial member elected to represent the city on the board of directors shall serve until a successor is elected at the next succeeding election of directors within the city and qualifies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

90811.

Notice of election shall be published as provided in Section 6066 of the Government Code and shall either state that a copy of the annexation agreement is on file in the office of the secretary or clerk of the city proposed to be annexed, and open to the inspection of all persons interested, or set forth the terms and conditions of the agreement of annexation at length, in the discretion of the legislative body calling the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90812.

The ballots for the election shall contain substantially the instructions required to be printed on ballots for use at general state and county elections and in addition shall set forth the proposition of annexation substantially as follows:Shall the __________ (city) be annexed to the San Diego County Transit District in accordance with and subject to all of the terms and conditions of an agreement of annexation dated ______ now on file in the office of the
 clerk of ________ (city)?YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90813.

If upon a canvass of the election it is found that a majority of all votes cast on the proposition at the election were cast in favor of the annexation, the proposition and all of the terms and conditions of the agreement of annexation shall be deemed carried and approved by the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90814.

If the proposition fails to carry, the result shall be entered upon the minutes of the governing body of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90815.

If the proposition receives the vote of the requisite majority of voters, the governing body of the city shall enter in its minutes an order declaring the result of the election and shall thereupon cause the agreement of annexation to be executed by its duly authorized officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Establishment of Annexation [90830. - 90830.]

90830.

Upon receipt by the district of a copy of the agreement of annexation properly executed by the district and the city proposed to be annexed, the board shall pass a resolution declaring the city annexed to the district, and shall cause a certified copy of the resolution to be filed with the Secretary of State. From and after the date of filing of the resolution with the Secretary of State, the annexation of the city to the district is complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Annexation of Territory to Cities [90850. - 90850.]

90850.

Any territory annexed in accordance with law to any city included in the district shall, upon the completion of such annexation proceeding, be deemed incorporated into and annexed to the district, and thereafter is subject to taxation, along with the entire territory of the district in accordance with the assessable valuation of the property thereof, for general district purposes, and for the payment of any indebtedness theretofore or thereafter incurred by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Effect of Annexation [90870. - 90871.]

90870.

From and after the date of annexation, the board shall levy upon all of the property in the city annexed, such taxes, tolls, or charges as are necessary to provide funds for the payment of the indebtedness assumed by the city or otherwise necessary to comply with the terms and conditions of the annexation agreement, all in addition to the general district taxes authorized elsewhere in this division to be levied and collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90871.

No annexation of a city to a district shall operate to dissolve or terminate the legal existence of the city annexed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Contest of Annexation [90880. - 90880.]

90880.

The validity of any proceedings for the annexation of any city to any district shall not be contested in any action unless the action is brought within three months after the completion of the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Annexation of Unincorporated Territory [90930. - 91040.]



  ARTICLE 1. Annexation Agreement [90930. - 90936.]

90930.

Unincorporated territory may be annexed to the district in the manner provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90931.

Unincorporated territory not contiguous to the district may not be annexed if the district does not possess facilities for supplying transit service to that territory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90932.

A petition signed by voters within the territory proposed to be annexed equal in number to at least 10 percent of the total vote cast, describing the territory and asking that proceedings be taken for its annexation, shall be addressed to the board and filed with the secretary of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90933.

The secretary shall compare the signatures on the petition with the affidavits of registration on file with the county elections official and if he or she finds that the petition has been signed by the required number of voters he or she shall attach his or her signature thereto and present the petition to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 111.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

90934.

If the board determines that the annexation of the territory would facilitate the acquisition or operation of any transit facilities for the district, or be of advantage to the district, then the board shall also determine the terms and conditions upon which the annexation should be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90935.

Provisions may be made, among other things, for payment of taxes within the territory to be annexed in addition to the taxes elsewhere in this act provided for, the fixing of rates, rentals, and charges differing from those fixed or existing elsewhere within the district, the incurring or assumption of indebtedness, or the making of a payment or payments, or the transfer of property, real and personal, and other assets to the district by the territory proposed to be annexed. The boundaries of the territory proposed to be annexed need not be coterminous with any election precincts. The terms and conditions shall become effective and be binding upon the district and the
 territory to be annexed with approval in the manner set forth in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90936.

As an alternative to commencement of annexation proceedings by a petition by the voters within any unincorporated territory, proposed to be annexed, the legislative body of an unincorporated territory may agree in writing upon the terms and conditions of annexation, which agreement may contain, among other things, provisions as set forth in Sections 90934 and 90935.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Approval by District [90950. - 90955.]

90950.

The board shall by ordinance setting forth the terms and conditions at length declare its intention of causing the agreement to be approved by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90951.

The ordinance together with a notice fixing the time and place for hearing thereon shall be published in the district pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code. A copy of the ordinance shall be filed with the secretary of the district. The time fixed for hearing shall not be less than 30 nor more than 60 days from the date of the publication of the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90952.

At the hearing any person interested may file with the board written objections to the approval of the terms and conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90953.

Upon the hearing, the board shall determine whether or not the terms and conditions will be approved and shall hear and determine all objections thereto. Failure of any person interested in the district or in the matter of the proposed annexation on the terms and conditions set forth in the ordinance to show cause in writing pursuant to Section 90952 constitutes an assent on his part to a change in the boundaries of the district upon the terms and conditions set forth.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90954.

If no protests are filed or the protests filed are overruled and denied by the board, the board shall by resolution finally approve the terms and conditions and proceed with the annexation in the manner provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90955.

If protests against the proposed annexation are sustained, all proceedings shall be dismissed and no proceedings shall be undertaken again concerning the territory or any part thereof until after the expiration of one year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Approval by Unincorporated Territory [90970. - 90975.]

90970.

Within 90 days after the board has finally approved the terms and conditions of annexation, the board shall cause an election to be held in the territory proposed to be annexed to determine whether the territory shall be annexed to the district upon the terms and conditions stated in the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90971.

Notice of election shall be published and shall either state that a copy of the ordinance containing the terms and conditions of annexation at length is on file in the office of the secretary of the district, and open to the inspection of all persons interested, or set forth the terms and conditions of annexation at length, in the discretion of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90972.

The ballots for the election shall contain substantially the instructions required to be printed on ballots for use at general state and county elections and in addition shall set forth the proposition of annexation substantially as follows:Shall the territory described in the petition filed with the Secretary of the San Diego County Transit District on the ____ day of
 ________ be annexed to the San Diego County Transit District in accordance with and subject to all of the terms and conditions set forth in that certain ordinance passed by the board of directors of the San Diego County Transit District on the ____ day of _______ a copy of which is now on file in the office of the Secretary of the San Diego County Transit District?YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90972.5.

In the event that no unincorporated territory shall have been included in the original formation of the district, an election shall be held concurrent with the first annexation election of unincorporated territory for the purpose of selecting one board member for the district in the event the annexation is successful. The initial member elected to represent the unincorporated territory on the board of directors shall serve until a successor is elected at the next succeeding election of directors within the unincorporated territory and qualifies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

90973.

If upon a canvass of the election it is found that a majority of all votes cast on the proposition at the election were cast in favor of the annexation, the proposition and all of the terms and conditions set forth in the ordinance shall be deemed carried and approved by the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90974.

If the proposition fails to carry, the result shall be entered upon the minutes of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90975.

If the proposition is defeated by the voters, no annexation proceeding shall be commenced involving the territory or any part thereof until after the expiration of one year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Establishment of Annexation [90990. - 90990.]

90990.

In the event the proposition receives the vote of the requisite majority of voters, the board shall pass a resolution declaring the territory annexed to the district, and shall cause a certified copy of the resolution to be filed with the Secretary of State, from and after the date of which filing with the Secretary of State the annexation of the territory to the district is complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Annexation Without Election [91010. - 91012.]

91010.

Unincorporated territory may be annexed to a district without an election in the manner provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

91011.

A petition describing the territory proposed to be annexed and requesting that proceedings be taken for its annexation shall be signed by all of the owners of the real property described therein, verified by the affidavit of one of the petitioners, addressed to the board, and filed with the secretary of the district. If a portion of the territory consists of public highways, streets, roads or paths, it shall not be necessary to secure the signatures to the petition of the owners only of the real property occupied by such public highways, streets, roads or paths.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

91012.

Proceedings shall thereafter be taken and a hearing held in substantial compliance with the provisions of this chapter relating to the annexation of unincorporated territory except that no election shall be held within the territory proposed to be annexed and the territory shall be deemed annexed to the district upon the passage of a resolution of the board declaring the territory annexed and the filing of a certified copy thereof with the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Effect of Annexation [91020. - 91020.]

91020.

From and after the date of annexation, the board shall levy upon all of the property in the territory annexed, such taxes, tolls, or charges as are necessary to provide funds for the payment of the indebtedness assumed by the territory or otherwise necessary to comply with the terms and conditions of the annexation, all in addition to the general district taxes authorized elsewhere in this act to be levied and collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Contest of Annexation [91040. - 91040.]

91040.

The validity of any proceedings for the annexation of any unincorporated territory to any district shall not be contested in any action unless the action is brought within three months after the completion of the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Dissolution [92000. - 92008.]

92000.

If the district operates no transit facilities, or its exterior boundaries become coincident with the boundaries of a single city, the board may call an election at any time for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the district the question of whether the district will be dissolved. Upon the filing with the secretary of such a district of a petition signed by voters within the district equal in number to at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the total vote cast, asking that the question of dissolution of the district be submitted to the voters of the district, the board shall call such an election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

92001.

The election for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the district the question of whether or not the district shall be dissolved shall be held within 60 days next succeeding the date on which the petition is filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

92002.

Notice of any election for dissolution, whether called because of the filing of a petition or ordered by the board without petition, shall be published. The date fixed for the election shall not be less than 30 days from the date of the first publication of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

92003.

The ballots for the election shall contain substantially the instructions required to be printed on ballots for use at general state and county elections and in addition the following: Shall the San Diego County Transit District be dissolved?YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

92004.

No other notice of the election other than that provided for in this chapter need be given and no sample ballots need be sent to the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

92005.

If upon a canvass of the election, it is found that a majority of all votes cast on the proposition at the election were in favor of the dissolution, the dissolution shall be deemed carried and approved by the voters. The board shall meet on Monday next succeeding the election and canvass the votes cast.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

92006.

Upon dissolution of any district which has boundaries that are coincident with the corporate limits of a city, the district property wherever situated vests absolutely in the city, and upon the dissolution of any district operating no transit facilities and which has boundaries that extend beyond the boundaries of a single city the property of the district wherever situated vests in the county in which the whole or greater portion of the district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

92007.

If at the time of dissolution, there is any outstanding indebtedness of the district the legislative authority of the city, where the limits of the district lie wholly within the corporate limits of a city, and in all other cases, the board of supervisors of the county in which the whole or greater portion of the district is situated are ex officio the board of directors of the district for the purpose only of the levy and collection of taxes for the payment of the indebtedness of the district existing at the time of dissolution and the interest thereon. The board or legislative authority shall levy the taxes and perform such other acts as are necessary to raise the money
 necessary for the payment of the indebtedness and the interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

92008.

In the event that the proposition for dissolution fails to carry, no subsequent election for the dissolution of the district shall be called until after the expiration of one year from the date of the prior election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Consolidation With Other Districts [93000. - 93017.]

93000.

The district may be consolidated with the Southern California Rapid Transit District organized and operating pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 30000) of this division, in the manner provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

93001.

Whenever the board finds and determines that:

(a) The Southern California Rapid Transit District is willing to annex the territory comprising the district;

(b) The annexing district has adequate facilities for and is able to supply transit service to the district in a manner equal to or superior to that presently rendered by the district;

(c) Annexation will not result in assumption of financial obligations by the taxpayers of the district disproportionate to the services which they
 will receive; the board shall thereafter negotiate an agreement with the annexing district specifying the terms and conditions of annexation and such other matters as are necessary and incidental thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

93002.

The board shall thereafter, by resolution setting forth the terms and conditions of the proposed contract at length, declare its intention to cause the agreement to be approved and effect consolidation of the district with the Southern California Rapid Transit District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

93003.

The resolution, together with a notice fixing the time and place for hearing thereon, shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district. The time fixed for hearing shall not be less than 30 nor more than 60 days from the date of publication of such notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

93004.

At the hearing any interested person may file with the board written objections to the approval of the terms and conditions of the proposed contract or the consolidation, or both the proposed contract and the consolidation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

93005.

Upon the hearing, the board shall determine whether or not the terms and conditions of the contract will be approved and the consolidation effected, and shall hear and determine all objections thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

93006.

Any hearing on the agreement and consolidation may be adjourned from time to time by the board, not exceeding 30 days in all, without further notice other than an order entered upon the minutes of the meeting fixing the time and place of adjournment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

93007.

If no protests are filed, or if the protests filed are overruled and denied by the board, the board shall thereupon by resolution finally approve the terms and conditions of the agreement and proceed with the consolidation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

93008.

At any time after the board of directors of the district has finally approved the agreement the Board of Supervisors of San Diego County shall cause an election to be held in the district to determine whether the San Diego County Transit District will be consolidated with the Southern California Rapid Transit District upon the terms and conditions stated in the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

93009.

Notice of election shall be published once a week for two successive weeks (two publications) in a newspaper of general circulation published within the district, and shall either state that a copy of the consolidation agreement is on file in the office of the Clerk of San Diego County, and open to the inspection of all persons interested, or set forth the terms and conditions of the consolidation agreement at length, in the discretion of the board of supervisors calling the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

93010.

The ballots for the election shall contain substantially the instructions required to be printed on ballots for use at general state and county elections and in addition shall set forth the proposition of consolidation substantially as follows: Shall the San Diego County Transit District be consolidated with the Southern California Rapid Transit District in accordance with and subject to all the terms and conditions of a consolidation agreement dated
 ____ now on file in the office of the Clerk of San Diego County?YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

93011.

If upon a canvass of the election it is found that a majority of all votes cast on the proposition at the election were cast in favor of the consolidation, the proposition and all of the terms and conditions of the consolidation agreement shall be deemed carried and approved by the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

93012.

If the proposition fails to carry, the result shall be entered upon the minutes of the Board of Supervisors of San Diego County.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

93013.

If the proposition receives the vote of the requisite majority of voters, the Board of Supervisors of San Diego County shall enter in its minutes an order declaring the result of the election and shall thereupon cause the consolidation agreement to be executed by its duly authorized officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

93014.

Upon receipt by the Southern California Rapid Transit District of a copy of the consolidation agreement properly executed by the district and San Diego County the board of directors of the Southern California Rapid Transit District shall pass a resolution declaring the San Diego County Transit District consolidated with the Southern California Rapid Transit District, and shall cause a certified copy of the resolution to be filed with the Secretary of State. From and after the date of filing of the resolution with the Secretary of State the consolidation of the San Diego County Transit District with the Southern California Rapid Transit District is
 complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

93015.

From and after the date of consolidation the board of directors of the Southern California Rapid Transit District shall levy upon all of the property in the former San Diego County Transit District such taxes, tolls, or charges as are necessary to provide funds for the payment of the indebtedness assumed by the former district or otherwise necessary to comply with the terms and conditions of the consolidation agreement, all in addition to the general district taxes authorized elsewhere in Part 3 (commencing with Section 30000) of this division to be levied and collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

93016.

The validity of any consolidating proceedings shall not be contested in any action unless the action is brought within three (3) months after the completion of the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

93017.

Upon the completion of such consolidation procedure, the San Diego County Transit District shall be deemed to be dissolved. Thereafter, all property and assets of the district which are not subject to the negotiated contract pertaining to consolidation shall be distributed to the County of San Diego.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 9. THE SANTA BARBARA METROPOLITAN TRANSIT DISTRICT [95000. - 97007.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [95000. - 95035.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [95000. - 95006.]

95000.

This act shall be known and cited as the “Santa Barbara Metropolitan Transit District Act of 1965.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

95001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this article govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

95002.

“District” means the Santa Barbara Metropolitan Transit District formed under this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

95003.

“Board” means the board of directors of this district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

95004.

“Voter” means any elector who is registered under the Elections Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

95005.

“Transit” means the transportation of passengers only and their incidental baggage by means other than by chartered bus, sightseeing bus, or any other motor vehicle not on an individual passenger fare-paying basis. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the district from leasing its buses to private certified public carriers or to prohibit the district from providing schoolbus service for the transportation of pupils between their homes and schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

95006.

“Transit works” or “transit facilities” means all real and personal property, equipment, rights, or interests owned or to be acquired by the district for transit service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [95030. - 95035.]

95030.

It is necessary that a transit district be established in the Santa Barbara metropolitan area which includes the City of Santa Barbara and adjacent territory, including but not limited to the Carpinteria, Summerland, Montecito and Goleta areas, all situated in Santa Barbara County, in order to meet the public transit problem of the area. The geographic location of the city in relation to the adjacent territory requiring transportation services makes it necessary to develop a single transit system to protect the public interest and welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 595.)
-------------------------------------------

95031.

The Santa Barbara Metropolitan Transit District may be created as provided in this act and when so created may exercise the powers herein granted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

95032.

Except as otherwise provided in this act elections shall be held and conducted and the result ascertained, determined, and declared in, all respects as nearly as practicable in conformity with the general elections laws of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

95033.

Except as otherwise provided in this part all ordinances and notices which are required to be published shall be published within the district pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

95034.

Whenever the signature of any officer or employee of a district or of any member of the retirement board or of any officer or employee of the retirement system is authorized or required under the provisions of this act, except in the single instance provided in Section 96443, the signature may be made by the use of a plate bearing facsimiles of such signatures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

95035.

The boundaries of the district shall not be affected by reason of the incorporation of any territory wholly or partly within the boundaries of the district, or by reason of annexation to or detachment from any city of territory wholly or partly within the boundaries of the district, except as provided in this part.

Where territory outside the district is annexed to any city included in the district, said territory shall, upon the completion of such annexation proceeding, be deemed incorporated into and annexed to the district; provided that, where territory which is incorporated as a new city is partly within and partly outside
 the district, that territory which is outside the district shall, upon the completion of such incorporation proceeding, be deemed incorporated into and annexed to the district; and provided further that no incorporated city now lying entirely outside the boundaries of the district shall be included within the district without the consent of the legislative body of said city, and any territory annexed by such city, if such annexed territory is then within the district, shall be automatically excluded from the district, unless the legislative body of the city shall otherwise declare in its ordinance of annexation.
